Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2819.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-710.04, to read: START_STATUTE41-710.04. Compost use; landscaping; land management; requirements; definition A. If The department of administration, the department of transportation or the arizona state parks board wishes to use soil amendments for landscaping or land management on land that is owned or managed by the department of administration, the department of transportation or the Arizona state parks board, the department of administration, the department of transportation or the Arizona state parks board shall use compost that is produced in this state, if AVAILABLe. B. Compost is considered to be available if the COMPOST meets all of the following requirements: 1. is produced at a facility that is located in this state and is offered for sale in this state. 2. meets the quality standards required by the project specifications, the procurement policies of the department of administration, the department of transportation or the Arizona state parks board or any applicable state or federal requirements. 3. can be delivered to the project site within a commercially reasonable time frame. 4. is offered at a price that is not more than twenty percent higher than the lowest cost of a comparable compost that is not produced in this state. C. For the purposes of this section, "compost" includes the biologically stable organic material that is produced through the controlled aerobic decomposition of organic matter and that is suitable for use as a soil amendment. END_STATUTE